Arkansas, session 2025, SB117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 17 is amended to add an additional
chapter to read as follows:
CHAPTER 108
NATUROPATHIC PHYSICIAN PRACTICE ACT

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

17-108-101. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Naturopathic
Physician Practice Act".

17-108-102. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
*JMB077*
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
(1) The practice of naturopathic medicine in this state affects
the public health, safety, and welfare and should be subject to regulation
and control in the public interest; and
(2) Naturopathic physicians comprise a distinct healthcare
profession that affects the public health, safety, and welfare and increases
freedom of choice in health care in this state.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to ensure that
naturopathic physicians and the practice of naturopathic medicine as defined
in this subchapter merit the confidence of the public, that only qualified
persons be authorized to practice naturopathic medicine in this state, and
that a person shall not practice naturopathic medicine without a valid
existing license.

17-108-103. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Approved naturopathic medical school" means a medical
school approved by the Arkansas State Board of Natural Medicine under this
subchapter that prepares a naturopathic physician for the practice of
naturopathic medicine;
(2) "Clinical laboratory procedure" means the use of
venipuncture consistent with naturopathic medical practice, commonly used
diagnostic modalities consistent with naturopathic practice, the recording of
a patient's health history, physical examination, ordering and interpretation
of radiographic diagnostics, and other standard imaging and examination of
body orifices, excluding endoscopy and colonoscopy;
(3) "Electromagnetism” means the administration of electricity
or its derivatives to assist in tissue healing and regeneration by cell
stimulation, removal of edema and inflammatory mediators, and angiogenesis;
(4) "Homeopathic medicine" means a system of medicine based on
the use of infinitesimal doses of substances capable of producing symptoms
similar to those of the disease treated, as listed in the Homeopathic
Pharmacopoeia of the United States;
(5) "Hygiene" means the use of preventive techniques, including
personal hygiene, asepsis, public health, and safety;
(6) "Laboratory examination" means:
(A) Phlebotomy;
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
(B) A clinical laboratory procedure;
(C) An orificial examination;
(D) A physiological function test; and
(E) A screening or test that is consistent with
naturopathic education and training;
(7) "Naturopathic medicine" means:
(A) A system of health care for the prevention, diagnosis,
and treatment of human health conditions, injury, and disease;
(B) The promotion or restoration of health; and
(C) The support and stimulation of a patient's inherent
self-healing processes through patient education and the use of naturopathic
therapies and therapeutic substances;
(8)(A) “Naturopathic physical medicine” means the manual
administration of mechanical treatment to body structures or tissues for the
purpose of restoring normal physiological function to the body by normalizing
and balancing the musculoskeletal system of the body, including massage,
stretching, resistance, or joint play examination.
(B) “Naturopathic physical medicine” does not include:
(i) The employment or application of chiropractic or
spinal adjustments and the principles or techniques of chiropractic science;
or
(ii) The manipulation or adjustment of the spine or
extremity joints of the human body beyond the elastic barrier, including
small amplitude movement at or beyond the end range of normal joint motion;
(9) "Naturopathic physician" means an individual licensed under
this subchapter as a naturopathic physician to practice naturopathic medicine
in this state;
(10) "Naturopathic therapeutic medicine" means the use of one
(1) or more of the following physical agents in a manner consistent with
naturopathic medical practice on a part or the whole of the body, by hand or
by mechanical means, in the resolution of a human ailment or condition:
(A) Air;
(B) Water;
(C) Heat;
(D) Cold;
(E) Sound;
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
(F) Light;
(G) Electromagnetism;
(H) Soft tissue therapy;
(I) Therapeutic exercise; or
(J) Naturopathic physical medicine;
(11) "Naturopathic therapy" means the use of:
(A) Naturopathic therapeutic medicine;
(B) Suggestion;
(C) Hygiene;
(D) A therapeutic substance;
(E) Nutrition and food science;
(F) Homeopathic medicine; or
(G) A clinical laboratory procedure;
(12) "Nutrition and food science" means the prevention and
treatment of disease or other human conditions through the use of food,
water, herbs, roots, bark, or natural food elements;
(13) "Professional examination" means a competency-based
national naturopathic physician licensing examination administered by the
North American Board of Naturopathic Examiners or its successor agency, which
nationally administers a naturopathic examination that represents federal
standards of education and training;
(14) "Suggestion" means a technique using:
(A) Biofeedback;
(B) Hypnosis;
(C) Health education; or
(D) Health counseling; and
(15) "Therapeutic substance" means any of the following
exemplified in a standard naturopathic medical text, journal, or
pharmacopeia:
(A) A vitamin;
(B) A mineral;
(C) A nutraceutical;
(D) A botanical medicine;
(E) Oxygen;
(F) A homeopathic medicine; or
(G) Other physiologic substance.
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117

17-108-104. Exemptions.
This subchapter does not prohibit or restrict:
(1) The practice of a healthcare profession by an individual who
is licensed, certified, or registered under the laws of this state and who is
performing services within the individual's scope of practice;
(2) The practice of naturopathic medicine by a student enrolled
in an approved naturopathic medical school if the practice of naturopathic
medicine by a student is performed under a course of instruction or an
assignment from an instructor and under the supervision of an instructor who
is a licensee or a duly licensed professional in the instructed field;
(3) A person that sells a vitamin or herb from providing
information about the vitamin or herb;
(4) The practice of naturopathic medicine by a person who is
licensed to practice in any other state or district in the United States and
who enters this state to consult with a naturopathic physician of this state
if the consultation is limited to examination, recommendation, or testimony
in litigation; or
(5) A person or practitioner who is not licensed as a
naturopathic physician from recommending ayurvedic medicine, herbal remedies,
nutritional advice, homeopathy, or other therapy that is within the scope of
practice of naturopathic medicine if that person or practitioner does not:
(A) Use a title protected under this subchapter;
(B) Represent or assume the character or appearance of a
licensee of this subchapter; or
(C) Otherwise use a name, title, or other designation that
indicates or implies that the person is a licensee of this subchapter.

17-108-105. Title protection.
(a) A licensee shall use the title "naturopathic physician" or
"naturopathic doctor" and the recognized abbreviation "N.D.".
(b) A licensee has the exclusive right to use the following terms in
reference to the licensee's self:
(1) "Naturopathic physician";
(2) "Naturopathic doctor";
(3) "Doctor of naturopathic medicine";
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
(4) "Doctor of naturopathy";
(5) "N.D.";
(6) "ND";
(7) "NMD"; and
(8) "N.M.D.".
(c) An individual represents the individual's self to be a
naturopathic physician or a naturopathic doctor when the individual uses or
adopts any of the terms in subdivisions (b)(1)-(8) of this section in
reference to the individual's self.
(d)(1) An individual shall not represent the individual's self to the
public as a naturopathic physician, naturopathic doctor, a doctor of
naturopathic medicine, or a doctor of naturopathy, or as being otherwise
authorized to practice naturopathic medicine in the state, unless the
individual is licensed under this subchapter.
(2) An individual who is not licensed under this subchapter is
guilty of a Class A misdemeanor if he or she:
(A) Holds himself or herself out as a naturopathic
physician or naturopathic doctor;
(B) Uses any combination or abbreviation of the term
"naturopathic physician" or "naturopathic doctor" indicating or implying that
he or she is a naturopathic physician or naturopathic doctor; or
(C) Acts as a naturopathic physician without being
licensed by the Arkansas State Board of Natural Medicine.

17-108-106. Approved naturopathic medical school.
(a) The Arkansas State Board of Natural Medicine shall establish, by
rule, guidelines for an approved naturopathic medical school and
specifications for the education of naturopathic physicians in this state.
(b) The guidelines established under subsection (a) of this section
shall include that the approved naturopathic medical school shall require at
a minimum:
(1) Graduation from:
(A) A naturopathic medical education program in the United
States providing the degree of Doctor of Naturopathy or Doctor of
Naturopathic Medicine, that:
(i) Offers graduate-level, full-time didactic, and
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
supervised clinical training;
(ii) Is accredited or has achieved candidacy status
for accreditation by the Council on Naturopathic Medical Education or an
equivalent federally recognized accrediting body for naturopathic medical
programs also recognized by the Arkansas State Board of Natural Medicine; and
(iii) Is an institution of higher education or part
of an institution of higher education that is either accredited or is a
candidate for accreditation by a regional or national institutional
accrediting agency recognized by the United States Secretary of Education;
(B) A degree-granting institution of higher education
that, before the existence of the Council on Naturopathic Medical Education,
offered a full-time, structured curriculum in basic sciences and supervised
patient care comprising a doctoral naturopathic medical education requiring
not less than one hundred thirty-two (132) weeks of coursework to be
completed within a period of not less than thirty-five (35) months, that was
reputable and in good standing in the judgment of the Arkansas State Board of
Natural Medicine and which, if still in existence, has current programmatic
accreditation by the Council on Naturopathic Medical Education or a federally
recognized equivalent accrediting agency;
(C) A diploma-granting, degree-equivalent institution of
higher education located in Canada that, before the existence of the Council
on Naturopathic Medical Education, had provincial approval for participation
in government-funded student aid programs, offered a full-time, structured
curriculum in basic sciences and supervised patient care comprising a
doctoral naturopathic medical education requiring not less than one hundred
thirty-two (132) weeks of coursework to be completed within a period of not
less than thirty (30) months, was reputable and in good standing in the
judgment of the Arkansas State Board of Natural Medicine, and, if still in
existence, has current programmatic accreditation by the Council on
Naturopathic Medical Education or a federally recognized equivalent
accrediting agency, and currently has provincial approval for participation
in government-funded student aid programs; or
(D) A diploma-granting, degree-equivalent institution of
higher education located in Canada that has provincial approval for
participation in government-funded student aid programs, offers graduate-
level, full-time didactic, and supervised clinical training, and is
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
accredited or has achieved candidacy status for accreditation by the Council
on Naturopathic Medical Education or an equivalent federally recognized
accrediting body for naturopathic medical programs also recognized by the
Arkansas State Board of Natural Medicine; and
(2) Successful completion of a competency-based national
naturopathic medicine licensing examination administered by the North
American Board of Naturopathic Examiners, or an equivalent agency recognized
by the Arkansas State Board of Natural Medicine, or, for graduates of
approved naturopathic medical programs in the United States before the
existence of the Council on Naturopathic Medical Education, a competency-
based state naturopathic medicine licensing examination, or equivalent
Canadian provincial licensing examination for the practice of naturopathic
medicine approved by the Arkansas State Board of Natural Medicine.

Subchapter 2 — Regulatory Agency

17-108-201. Arkansas State Board of Natural Medicine — Powers and
duties.
The Arkansas State Board of Natural Medicine shall:
(1) Regulate the licensure of naturopathic physicians and
determine the hours of continuing education units required for maintaining a
license as a naturopathic physician;
(2) Prescribe the manner in which records of
examinations and treatments shall be kept and maintained;
(3) Establish:
(A) Standards for professional responsibility and conduct;
(B) Criteria for advertising or promotional materials;
(C) Continuing education hours and content;
(D) Standards for the state jurisprudence examination;
(E) Schedules for providing licensing examinations and for
the issuance of examination results;
(F) Procedures and standards for reviewing licensing
examination scores;
(G) Procedures for reviewing transcripts demonstrating
completion of an approved naturopathic medical school;
(H) Requirements for issuance and renewal of licenses; and
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
(I) Any other matter necessary to implement this chapter;
(4) Identify disciplinary actions and circumstances that require
disciplinary action;
(5) Develop a means to provide information to all naturopathic
physicians in the state;
(6) Provide for:
(A) The investigation of complaints against naturopathic
physicians or persons holding themselves out as naturopathic physicians in
the state;
(B) The publication of information for the public about
naturopathic physicians and the practice of naturopathic medicine in the
state; and
(C) An orderly process for reinstatement of a license; and
(7) Create and maintain a list of approved naturopathic medical
schools that meet statutory requirements under this chapter.

Subchapter 3 — Licensure

17-108-301. Qualifications for licensure.
The Arkansas State Board of Natural Medicine shall license an applicant
who:
(1) Submits, in accordance with rules of the board, the
following items to the board:
(A) An application for licensure developed by the board
and submitted in accordance with rules of the board;
(B) An application fee submitted in an amount and manner
established by rules of the board;
(C) Evidence that the applicant has:
(i) Graduated from an approved naturopathic medical
school;
(ii) Successfully completed a competency-based
national naturopathic medicine licensing examination; and
(iii) Passed a state jurisprudence examination that
meets standards established in rules of the board;
(D) Evidence of professional liability insurance with
policy limits not less than prescribed by the board;
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
(2) Is determined by the board to be physically and mentally
capable of safely practicing naturopathic medicine with or without reasonable
accommodation; and
(3) Has not had a license to practice naturopathic medicine or
other healthcare license, registration, or certificate refused, revoked, or
suspended by any other jurisdiction for reasons that relate to the
applicant's ability to skillfully and safely practice naturopathic medicine
unless that license, registration, or certification has been restored to good
standing by that jurisdiction.

17-108-302. Scope of practice.
A licensee may practice naturopathic medicine to provide primary care
in alignment with naturopathic medical education to:
(1) Perform physical examinations;
(2) Order laboratory examinations;
(3) Order diagnostic imaging studies;
(4) Interpret the results of laboratory examinations for
diagnostic purposes;
(5) Order and, based on a radiologist's report, take action on
diagnostic imaging studies in a manner consistent with naturopathic training;
(6) Prescribe, administer, dispense, and order food, extracts of
food, nutraceuticals, vitamins, amino acids, minerals, enzymes, botanicals
and their extracts, botanical medicines, homeopathic medicines, all dietary
supplements, and nonprescription drugs as defined by the Federal Food, Drug,
and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq., as existing on January 1, 2025;
(7) Use routes of administration of therapeutic substances that
include oral, nasal, auricular, ocular, rectal, vaginal, and transdermal
consistent with the education and training of a naturopathic physician;
(8) Perform naturopathic therapeutic medicine;
(9) Employ the use of naturopathic therapy; and
(10) Use therapeutic devices, barrier contraception, and durable
medical equipment.

17-108-303. License expiration and renewal — Denial and revocation —
Continuing education.
(a) A license issued or renewed under this chapter shall expire two
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
(2) years following its issuance or renewal.
(b) The Arkansas State Board of Natural Medicine may renew the license
of any naturopathic physician who, upon the expiration of his or her license:
(1) Has submitted an application for renewal;
(2) Has paid the renewal fee established by rules of the board;
(3) Meets the qualifications for licensure under this subchapter
and rules of the board; and
(4) Meets the continuing education requirements established by
the board.
(c) The board shall grant an opportunity for a hearing to applicants
and licensees for whom the board intends to refuse to issue or renew a
license, or whose license the board proposes to revoke or suspend.

17-108-304. Display of license.
A naturopathic physician shall display his or her license in his or her
place of business in a location clearly visible to his or her patients and
shall also display evidence of the naturopathic physician having completed an
approved naturopathic medical school.

17-108-305. Referral requirement.
A naturopathic physician shall refer to a physician licensed to
practice in the state any patient whose medical condition is determined, at
the time of evaluation or treatment, to be beyond the scope of practice of
the naturopathic physician.

17-108-306. Criminal background check.
(a)(1) Each applicant for a license issued by the Arkansas State Board
of Natural Medicine is required to apply to the Identification Bureau of the
Division of Arkansas State Police for a state and federal criminal background
check to be conducted by the Identification Bureau of the Division of
Arkansas State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
(2) A license shall not be issued to an applicant until the
board receives and approves the state and federal criminal background check.
(b) The criminal background check shall conform to applicable federal
standards that are in effect on January 1, 2025, and shall include the taking
of fingerprints.
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
(c) The applicant shall sign a release of information to the board and
shall be responsible to the Division of Arkansas State Police for the payment
of any fee associated with the criminal background check.
(d) Upon completion of the criminal background check, the
Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall forward
to the board all releasable information obtained concerning the applicant in
the commission of any offense listed in subsection (e) of this section.
(e) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, a person
shall not receive or hold a license issued by the board if the person has
been convicted of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to any felony listed
under § 17-3-102 or a crime involving fraud, dishonesty, untruthfulness, or
untrustworthiness, or is a registered sex offender or required to register as
a sex offender.
(f)(1) The provisions of subsection (e) of this section may be waived
by the board upon the request of:
(A) An affected applicant for licensure; or
(B) The person holding a license subject to sanctions.
(2) Circumstances for which a waiver may be granted shall
include without limitation:
(A) The age at which the crime was committed;
(B) The circumstances surrounding the crime;
(C) The length of time since the crime was committed;
(D) Subsequent work history;
(E) Employment references;
(F) Character references; and
(G) Other evidence demonstrating that the applicant does
not pose a threat to the public.
(g)(1) Information received by the board from the Identification
Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police or the Federal Bureau of
Investigation under this section shall not be available for examination
except by:
(A) The affected applicant for licensure or his or her
authorized representative; or
(B) The person whose license is subject to revocation or
his or her authorized representative.
(2) A record, file, or document shall not be removed from the
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
custody of the division.
(h) Information made available to the affected applicant for licensure
or the person whose license is subject to revocation shall pertain to that
person only.
(i) Rights of privilege and confidentiality established in this
section shall not extend to any document created for purposes other than the
background check.
(j) The board may adopt rules to fully implement this section.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-102-102(1), concerning the definition of
"acupuncture" within the Arkansas Acupuncture Practices Act, is amended to
read as follows:
(1) “Acupuncture” means the insertion, manipulation, and removal
of filiform needles from the body and the use of other modalities and
procedures at specific locations on the body for the prevention, cure, or
correction of a malady, illness, injury, pain, or other condition or disorder
by controlling and regulating the flow and balance of energy and functioning
of the patient to restore and maintain health, but acupuncture shall not be
considered surgery;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 17-102-102(3), concerning the definition of
"board" within the Arkansas Acupuncture Practices Act, is repealed.

(3) “Board” means the Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and
Related Techniques;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 17-102-103(a)(1), concerning the
disposition of funds under the Arkansas Acupuncture Practices Act, is amended
to read as follows:
(a)(1) All fees authorized by this chapter are the property of the
Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques Natural Medicine
and shall be provided to the Treasurer of the Arkansas State Board of
Acupuncture and Related Techniques Natural Medicine to be disposed of as
provided in this chapter.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 17-102-104(c) is amended to read as
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
follows:
(c) A person licensed or certified under this chapter shall not
identify himself or herself as a doctor or physician unless he or she has
earned a doctorate degree or transitional doctoral degree from an accredited,
approved, or authorized education institution as approved by Arkansas State
Board of Natural Medicine.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 17-102-106 is amended to read as follows:
17-102-106. Prosecution of violations.
It shall be the duty of the several prosecuting attorneys of the State
of Arkansas to prosecute to final judgment every criminal violation of this
chapter committed within their jurisdictions when requested and authorized by
the Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques Natural
Medicine.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 102, Subchapter 2, as
amended by Sections 33, 34, and 35 of Acts 2025, No. 170, is amended to read
as follows:
Subchapter 2 — Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques
Natural Medicine

17-102-201. Creation of board — Members — Appointment.
(a)(1)(A) There is created the Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and
Related Techniques Natural Medicine.
(B) The board shall consist of five (5) eight (8) persons
appointed by the Governor as full members and one (1) person appointed by the
Governor as an ex officio member subject to confirmation by the Senate for
terms of three (3) years, except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section.
(2) Three (3) full members of the board shall be qualified
acupuncturists.
(3) Three (3) members shall be qualified naturopathic
physicians.
(3)(A)(4)(A) Two (2) full members shall be appointed to
represent the public and shall not have practiced acupuncture and related
techniques, naturopathic medicine, or any other medical professional
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
regulated by the board in this or any other jurisdiction nor be retired from
or have any financial interest in the occupation occupations regulated.
(B) The public members shall be subject to confirmation by
the Senate. One (1) member shall represent consumers, and one (1) member
shall be sixty (60) years of age or older and shall be the representative of
the elderly.
(C) The same member shall not represent both consumers and
the elderly under subdivision (a)(4)(B) of this section.
(C)(D) The public members shall be full voting members but
shall not participate in the grading of examinations.
(4)(A) The ex officio member shall be a physician licensed
pursuant to the Arkansas Medical Practices Act, § 17-95-201 et seq., § 17-95-
301 et seq., and § 17-95-401 et seq., and shall be entitled to be notified of
all board meetings and to participate in the deliberations of the board.
(B) However, the ex officio member shall have no vote,
shall not serve as an officer of the board, and shall not be counted to
establish a quorum or a majority necessary to conduct business.
(5)(A) On a biennial basis, the board shall file a written
report with the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the
Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.
(B) The report shall contain a certified copy of the
minutes of all board meetings as required by § 17-102-205 for the calendar
years covering the period of time since the last report.
(C) The report shall contain a comprehensive assessment of
the board's functionality, including without limitation staff and office site
adequacy and any other information as may be requested by the House Committee
on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor sufficient for the House Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor to make a recommendation to the Governor regarding whether
the board should be continued or whether the board should be disbanded and
abolished in accordance with a proclamation issued by the Governor.
(b)(1) The initial full members of the board shall be appointed by the
Governor for staggered terms as follows:
(A) One (1) member's term shall expire after one (1) year;
(B) One (1) member's term shall expire after two (2)
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
years; and
(C) One (1) member's term shall expire after three (3)
years.
(2) Of the two (2) additional members appointed pursuant to Acts
1999, No. 536, one (1) shall be appointed for a two-year term and the other
for a three-year term.
(3) The initial ex officio board member shall be appointed to a
term of three (3) years.
(4) Successors shall be appointed for three-year terms.
(5)(2) Vacancies shall be filled by appointment by the Governor
for the unexpired term.
(6)(3) Board members shall serve until their successors have
been appointed and qualified.
(c) The Governor may remove any full member from the board for any
reason that would justify the suspension or revocation of his or her license
to practice acupuncture and related techniques.
The term of each member shall expire on December 31 of the year
designated, and a successor appointee shall be named by the Governor, subject
to confirmation by the Senate, on or before the expiration date of the term
expiring.
(d)(1) Vacancies shall be filled by appointment by the Governor within
thirty (30) days of the vacancy.
(2) Vacancies of a professional member must be filled by a
qualified appointee from the same profession.
(e) The members of the board shall take the oath prescribed by the
Arkansas Constitution for state officers before entering upon the discharge
of their duties.
(f)(1) A member of the board may be removed from the board by the
Governor:
(A) For good cause under § 25-16-804;
(B) For cause including dishonorable or unprofessional
conduct, abuse of authority, malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance; or
(C) For any reason that would justify probation,
suspension, or revocation of his or her license to practice in the medical
profession he or she represents.
(2) A member of the board shall not be involved in an
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
investigation except to cooperate with the investigation as required by the
investigator.
(d)(g) A person who is or has been in the preceding two (2) years on
the faculty of a school which is subject to review by the board may not serve
on the board.

17-102-202. Board members — Qualifications.
(a) Each member of the Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related
Techniques Natural Medicine shall be a citizen of the United States, a
resident of this state, and, before entering upon the duties of the office,
shall take the oath prescribed by the Arkansas Constitution for state
officers and shall file it with the Secretary of State who shall thereupon
issue to each person so appointed a certificate of appointment.
(b) Each full professional member who is a qualified acupuncturist
also shall be a graduate of a reputable school or institute of acupuncture or
Oriental medicine and be certified by the National Certification Commission
for Acupuncture and Oriental Medicine.

17-102-203. Board members — Liability.
(a) A No member of the Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related
Techniques Natural Medicine during the term of his or her office or
thereafter shall not be liable for damages as a result of any official act in
the performance of his or her duty as such a member.
(b) Any action therefor shall upon motion be dismissed with prejudice
at the cost of the plaintiff.

17-102-204. Board organization — Meetings.
(a) The Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques
shall in May each year hold a meeting and elect from the board's membership a
president, a secretary, and a treasurer for terms set by the board.
(b)(1) It shall be the duty of the board to meet regularly one (1)
time in every six (6) months.
(2) Special meetings of the board may be called at any time at
the pleasure of the President of the Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and
Related Techniques or by the Secretary of the Arkansas State Board of
Acupuncture and Related Techniques on the request of any two (2) full members
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
of the board.
(3) Three (3) full members shall constitute a quorum at any
meeting of the board.
(c) The board shall determine by its own rules the time and manner of
giving notice to members of meetings and other matters.
(d) Any action of the board shall require an affirmative vote of a
majority of the full membership of the board, excluding the ex officio
member.
(a)(1) Within thirty (30) days of appointment of members, the members
of the Arkansas State Board of Natural Medicine shall meet and organize by
electing a chair, vice chair, secretary, and treasurer.
(2) The Treasurer of the Arkansas State Board of Natural
Medicine shall give bond in such amount as may be designated by the board,
which may be increased or decreased from time to time, conditioned for the
faithful disbursement and accounting of all moneys coming into his or her
hands as the treasurer.
(b) The board shall hold its regular meetings as established by rule
of the board and shall have the power to call and hold special meetings at
such times and places as deemed necessary.

17-102-205. Board minutes — Records.
(a) The Secretary of the Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and
Related Techniques Natural Medicine shall keep a record of the minutes of its
meetings and a record of all persons making application for license and the
action of the Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques
Natural Medicine thereon.
(b) The secretary shall also keep a record of the names, addresses,
and license numbers of all acupuncturists licensed by the board, together
with a record of license renewals, suspensions, and revocations.

17-102-206. Board duties and powers.
(a)(1) The Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques
Natural Medicine is empowered to incur whatever expenses it may deem
necessary or expedient in performing its functions.
(2) All of the disbursements provided for in this section shall
be out of the fees and fines collected by the Arkansas State Board of
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
Acupuncture and Related Techniques Natural Medicine.
(b) The Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques is
authorized to Natural Medicine shall:
(1) Make suitable bylaws for carrying out the duties of the
Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques Natural Medicine
under the provisions of this chapter;
(2) Sue and be sued;
(3) Have an official seal that shall bear the words “Arkansas
State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques Natural Medicine”;
(4)(A) Provide a secretary's certificate.
(B) The certificate of the Secretary of the Arkansas State
Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques Natural Medicine under seal shall
be accepted in the courts of the state as the best evidence as to the minutes
of the Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques Natural
Medicine and shall likewise be accepted in the courts of the state as the
best evidence as to the licensure or nonlicensure of any person under the
requirements of this chapter;
(5)(A) Adopt, publish, and, from time to time, revise rules
consistent with the law as may be necessary to enable the Arkansas State
Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques Natural Medicine to carry into
effect the provisions of this chapter and the Naturopathic Physician Practice
Act, § 17-108-101 et seq.
(B) All proposed rules after July 31, 2009, shall be
approved in writing by the Arkansas State Medical Board under the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., but before submission to
the Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council;
(6) Keep a record of all proceedings, receipts, and
disbursements of the Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related
Techniques Natural Medicine;
(7) Adopt standards for applicants wishing to take the licensing
examination under this chapter and conduct examinations or contract with
persons or entities to conduct examinations of applicants under this chapter;
(8)(A) Grant, deny, renew, suspend, or revoke licenses to
practice acupuncture and related techniques for any cause stated in this
chapter.
(B) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, the
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques Natural Medicine
shall have exclusive jurisdiction to determine who shall be permitted to
practice acupuncture and related techniques in the State of Arkansas; and
(9) Conduct disciplinary proceedings under this chapter and the
Naturopathic Physician Practice Act, § 17-108-101 et seq.;
(10) Develop a means to provide information to all professionals
in this state governed by the Arkansas State Board of Natural Medicine; and
(11) Provide for:
(A) The investigation of complaints against any person
regulated by the Arkansas State Board of Natural Medicine or holding himself
or herself out to be a professional regulated by the Arkansas State of
Natural Medicine;
(B) The publication of information for the public about
professions and practices regulated by the Arkansas State Board of Natural
Medicine; and
(C) An orderly process for the reinstatement of a license.
(c)(1) In the performance of the duties of the Arkansas State Board of
Acupuncture and Related Techniques Natural Medicine, the Arkansas State Board
of Acupuncture and Related Techniques Natural Medicine may administer oaths
and take testimony on any matters within the Arkansas State Board of
Acupuncture and Related Techniques' Natural Medicine's jurisdiction and issue
subpoenas and thereby compel the attendance of persons before the Arkansas
State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques Natural Medicine for the
purpose of examining any facts or conditions properly pending before the
Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques Natural Medicine
for action of the Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques
Natural Medicine.
(2) All subpoenas issued by the Arkansas State Board of
Acupuncture and Related Techniques Natural Medicine shall be served in the
manner prescribed by law for the service of subpoenas issuing from the
courts, and all persons so served shall obey the subpoenas or be subject to
the penalties provided by law for the disobedience of subpoenas issuing from
the courts.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 17-102-303(c), concerning the unlawful
practices and penalties under the Arkansas Acupuncture Practices Act, is
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) The courts of this state having general equity jurisdiction are
vested with jurisdiction and power to enjoin the unlawful practice of
acupuncture and related techniques in a proceeding by the Arkansas State
Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques Natural Medicine or any member
thereof or by any citizen of this state in the county in which the alleged
unlawful practice occurred or in which the defendant resides or in Pulaski
County.
(2) The issuance of an injunction shall not relieve a person
from criminal prosecution for violation of the provisions of this chapter,
but the remedy of injunction shall be in addition to liability to criminal
prosecution.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 17-102-304(a)(1) and (2), concerning the
application and qualifications to be licensed as an acupuncturist under the
Arkansas Acupuncture Practices Act, are amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) No A person shall not be licensed to practice acupuncture and
related techniques unless he or she has passed an examination and has been
found to have the necessary qualifications as prescribed in the rules adopted
by the Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques Natural
Medicine.
(2)(A) Applications for a license to practice acupuncture and
related techniques in the State of Arkansas pursuant to this chapter shall be
made to the Secretary of the Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related
Techniques Natural Medicine in writing on forms furnished by the board.
(B) The application shall be signed by the applicant in
his or her own handwriting and acknowledged before an officer authorized to
administer oaths.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 17-102-305(b), concerning examinations for
an acupuncturist under the Arkansas Acupuncture Practices Act, is amended to
read as follows:
(b)(1) The Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques
Natural Medicine shall hold an examination at least one (1) time each
calendar year, and all applicants shall be notified in writing of the date
and time of all examinations.
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
(2) The board may utilize a nationally recognized examination if
it deems the national exam is sufficient to qualify a practitioner for
licensure in this state.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 17-102-307(1), concerning license renewal
under the Arkansas Acupuncture Practices Act, is amended to read as follows:
(1) Meets all current standards of the Arkansas State Board of
Acupuncture and Related Techniques Natural Medicine; and

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 17-102-308(a), concerning continuing
education for acupuncturists under the Arkansas Acupuncture Practices Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(a) The Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques
Natural Medicine shall not renew the license of any person engaged in the
practice of acupuncture and related techniques unless the licensee presents
to the board evidence of attendance at a board-approved educational session
or sessions of not fewer than twenty-four (24) hours of continuing education
within the previous biennial period.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 17-102-309(a), concerning disciplinary
actions and grounds under the Arkansas Acupuncture Practices Act, is amended
to read as follows:
(a) The following acts by an applicant for a license or by a licensed
acupuncturist shall constitute grounds for which the disciplinary actions
specified in subsection (b) of this section may be taken by the Arkansas
State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques Natural Medicine:
(1) Attempting to obtain, obtaining, or renewing a license to
practice acupuncture and related techniques by bribery, fraud, or deceit;
(2) Having pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or having been
found guilty of, a crime in any jurisdiction which directly relates to the
practice of acupuncture and related techniques or to the ability to practice
same;
(3) Advertising, practicing, or attempting to practice under a
name other than one's own;
(4) Making deceptive, untrue, or fraudulent representations in
the practice of acupuncture and related techniques;
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
(5) Becoming mentally incompetent or unfit or incompetent by
reason of negligence, habits, or other causes;
(6) Becoming habitually intemperate or addicted to the use of
habit-forming drugs, illegal drugs, or alcohol;
(7) Acting unprofessionally in the practice of acupuncture and
related techniques;
(8) Committing fraud or deceit in filing insurance forms,
documents, or information pertaining to the health or welfare of a patient;
or
(9) Willfully or repeatedly violating any of the provisions of
this chapter or any rule or order of the board.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 25-16-903(1), concerning the authorization
for a sixty dollar ($60.00) stipend, is amended to read as follows:
(1) Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related Techniques
Natural Medicine;

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 25-43-802(a)(15), concerning the state
entities transferred to the Department of Health, is amended to read as
follows:
(15) The Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related
Techniques Natural Medicine, created under § 17-102-201;

SECTION 16. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. Issuance of first
licenses.
On or before December 1, 2025, the Arkansas State Board of Natural
Medicine shall issue licenses to those applicants who have met the
requirements of this act and board rules promulgated in accordance with this
act.

SECTION 17. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. Transition period -
Membership.
(a)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the
existing members of the Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and Related
Techniques shall have their terms expire upon the effective date of this act.
(2) The two (2) members of the Arkansas State Board of
04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/31/25 H4/8/25 SB117
Acupuncture and Related Techniques who represent the public shall continue to
serve as members of the Arkansas State Board of Natural Medicine and shall
exercise the powers and duties assigned until the expiration of the members'
terms.
(3) Members of the Arkansas State Board of Acupuncture and
Related Techniques may be appointed to serve as members of the Arkansas State
Board of Natural Medicine.
(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, upon the
effective date of this act, the initial members of the Arkansas State Board
of Natural Medicine created under this act shall be appointed by the Governor
for staggered terms as follows:
(1) The term of one (1) member who is an acupuncturist and one
(1) member who is a naturopathic physician shall expire after one (1) year;
(2) The term of one (1) member who is an acupuncturist and one
(1) member who is a naturopathic physician shall expire after two (2) years;
and
(3) The term of one (1) member who is an acupuncturist and one
(1) member who is a naturopathic physician shall expire after three (3)
years.

/s/C. Penzo















04-08-2025 10:16:01 JMB077